Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1219
Business, defined.

Business shall mean any lawful activity, except a farm operation, conducted primarily (1) for the purchase, sale, lease, or rental of personal or real property or for the manufacture, processing, or marketing of products, commodities, or any other personal property, (2) for the sale of services to the public, (3) by a nonprofit organization, or (4) solely for the purposes of sections 76-1228 to 76-1230, for the erection and maintenance of outdoor advertising displays, whether or not such displays are located on the premises on which any of the other activities defined as business are conducted.

Laws 1989, LB 254, § 6.